Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Kentucky Capitol Centennial Commission

171.750.
Kentucky Capitol Centennial Commission. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 43, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

171.751.
Duties of Kentucky Capitol Centennial Commission. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 43, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

171.752.
Expiration of Kentucky Capitol Centennial Commission. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 43, § 3, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.